Hawaii statutes.
[§507-72] Applicability. This part
shall only apply to rental agreements entered into, or extended, or renewed
after June 4, 1984. [L 1984, c 239, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"June 4, 1984" substituted for "the effective
date of this part".

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next